Massachusetts, session 194th, H1007.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 68. The department shall make available housing without charge to the
superintendent of the Manuel F. Correllus state forest on Martha’s Vineyard. The housing shall
be the existing house in the forest. If the superintendent elects not to live in the house, the
department shall make the house available to other employees of the department who care for the
forest, on the same terms.
of 1